Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 9 TLSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND 2 Section 1. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS ââ 3 ADMINISTRATION. There is appropriated from the general 4 fund of the state to the department for the blind for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 6 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 10 equivalent positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,207,190 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 103.74 13 DIVISION II 14 FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 15 Sec. 2. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated 16 from the general fund of the state to the department of 17 education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 18 ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof 19 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 20 1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION 21 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 22 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 23 equivalent positions: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,073,808 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 71.87 26 2. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION ADMINISTRATION 27 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 28 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 29 equivalent positions: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 721,779 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 10.80 32 3. PUBLIC BROADCASTING DIVISION 33 For salaries, support, maintenance, capital expenditures, 34 and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 35 -1- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 1/ 37 H.F. _____ full-time equivalent positions: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,165,236 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 53.20 3 4. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION 4 For reimbursement for career and technical education 5 expenditures made by regional career and technical education 6 planning partnerships in accordance with section 256.136: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,952,459 8 5. SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE 9 For use as state matching moneys for federal programs that 10 shall be disbursed according to federal regulations, including 11 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and 12 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,176,797 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 27.83 15 6. BIRTH TO AGE THREE SERVICES 16 a. For expansion of the federal Individuals with 17 Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004, Pub. L. No. 18 108-446, as amended to January 1, 2018, birth through age three 19 services due to increased numbers of children qualifying for 20 those services: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,721,400 22 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, 23 $383,769 shall be allocated to the child health specialty 24 clinics administered by the state university of Iowa in order 25 to provide additional support for infants and toddlers who are 26 born prematurely, drug-exposed, or medically fragile. 27 7. EARLY HEAD START PROJECTS 28 a. For early head start projects: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 574,500 30 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 31 used for implementation and expansion of early head start 32 pilot projects addressing the comprehensive cognitive, social, 33 emotional, and developmental needs of children from birth to 34 age three, including prenatal support for qualified families. 35 -2- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 2/ 37 H.F. _____ The projects shall promote healthy prenatal outcomes and 1 healthy family functioning, and strengthen the development of 2 infants and toddlers in low-income families. Priority shall be 3 given to those organizations that have previously qualified for 4 and received state funding to administer an early head start 5 project. 6 8. STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT AND TEACHER QUALITY PROGRAM 7 For purposes of the student achievement and teacher quality 8 program established pursuant to chapter 284 , and for not more 9 than the following full-time equivalent positions: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,990,467 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5.83 12 9. STATEWIDE STUDENT ASSESSMENT 13 a. For distribution to the Iowa testing program by the 14 department of education on behalf of school districts and 15 accredited nonpublic schools to offset the costs associated 16 with a statewide student assessment administered in accordance 17 with section 256.7, subsection 21 , paragraph âbâ: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 19 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more 20 than $300,000 shall be distributed to the Iowa testing programs 21 within the state university of Iowa college of education 22 to offset the costs of administering the statewide student 23 assessment at accredited nonpublic schools. 24 10. STATEWIDE CLEARINGHOUSE TO EXPAND WORK-BASED LEARNING 25 For support costs associated with the creation of a 26 statewide clearinghouse to expand work-based learning: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 28 11. POSTSECONDARY SUMMER CLASSES FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS 29 PROGRAM 30 For support costs associated with the creation of a program 31 to provide additional moneys for resident high school pupils 32 enrolled in grades 9 through 12 to attend a community college 33 for college-level classes or attend a class taught by a 34 community college-employed instructor during the summer and 35 -3- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 3/ 37 H.F. _____ outside of the regular school year through a contractual 1 agreement between a community college and a school district: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 3 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 4 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 5 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 6 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 7 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 8 fiscal year. 9 12. JOBS FOR AMERICAâS GRADUATES 10 For school districts to reinforce collaborative efforts and 11 regional initiatives that accelerate work-based learning and 12 credential attainment, and to provide direct career education 13 services to identified middle school or high school students 14 enrolled in school districts through direct instruction by a 15 jobs for Americaâs graduates specialist: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,946,450 17 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys received by the 18 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 19 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 20 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 21 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 22 fiscal year. 23 13. ATTENDANCE CENTER PERFORMANCE/GENERAL INTERNET SITE AND 24 DATA SYSTEM SUPPORT 25 For administration of a process for school districts to 26 establish specific performance goals and to evaluate the 27 performance of each attendance center operated by the district 28 in order to arrive at an overall school performance grade and 29 report card for each attendance center, for internet site 30 and data system support, and for not more than the following 31 full-time equivalent positions: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.60 34 14. SUCCESSFUL PROGRESSION FOR EARLY READERS 35 -4- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 4/ 37 H.F. _____ For distribution to school districts for implementation 1 of section 279.68, subsection 2 , relating to successful 2 progression for early readers: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,824,782 4 15. EARLY WARNING SYSTEM FOR LITERACY 5 a. For purposes of purchasing a statewide license for an 6 early warning assessment and administering the early warning 7 system for literacy established in accordance with section 8 279.68 and rules adopted in accordance with section 256.7, 9 subsection 31 : 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,915,000 11 b. The department shall administer and distribute to school 12 districts and accredited nonpublic schools the early warning 13 assessment system that allows teachers to screen and monitor 14 student literacy skills from prekindergarten through grade 15 six. The department may charge school districts and accredited 16 nonpublic schools a fee for the system not to exceed the actual 17 costs to purchase a statewide license for the early warning 18 assessment minus the moneys received by the department under 19 this subsection. The fee shall be determined by dividing the 20 actual remaining costs to purchase the statewide license for 21 the school year by the number of pupils assessed under the 22 system in the current fiscal year. School districts may use 23 moneys received pursuant to section 257.10, subsection 11 , and 24 moneys received for purposes of implementing section 279.68, 25 subsection 2 , to pay the early warning assessment system fee. 26 16. IOWA READING RESEARCH CENTER 27 a. For purposes of the Iowa reading research center in 28 order to implement, in collaboration with the area education 29 agencies, the provisions of section 256.9, subsection 49 , 30 paragraph âcâ: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 32 b. From moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more 33 than $250,000 shall be used for collaborations with the state 34 board of education relating to the approval of practitioner 35 -5- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 5/ 37 H.F. _____ preparation programs pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 3 , 1 paragraph âcâ, and with the board of educational examiners for 2 the establishment and continuing oversight of the advanced 3 dyslexia specialist endorsement pursuant to section 256.146, 4 subsection 21. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 5 ending June 30, 2027, the center shall submit a report to the 6 general assembly detailing the expenditures of moneys used for 7 purposes of this paragraph âbâ. 8 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 9 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 10 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 11 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 12 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 13 fiscal year. 14 17. COMPUTER SCIENCE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT INCENTIVE 15 FUND 16 For deposit in the computer science professional development 17 incentive fund established in section 284.6A : 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 19 18. CHILDRENâS MENTAL HEALTH SCHOOL-BASED TRAINING AND 20 SUPPORT 21 a. For distribution to area education agencies for 22 school-based childrenâs mental health services, including 23 mental health awareness training for educators: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,899,682 25 b. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection for 26 distribution to area education agencies, $200,000 shall be 27 used for purposes of implementing a childrenâs grief and loss 28 rural pilot program to serve Iowa children in rural school 29 districts or accredited nonpublic schools. The pilot program 30 shall be administered by, and the moneys allocated pursuant to 31 this paragraph shall be distributed to, an existing statewide 32 not-for-profit health care organization that currently provides 33 grief and loss services to children. For the fiscal year 34 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the health 35 -6- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 6/ 37 H.F. _____ care organization receiving moneys pursuant to this paragraph 1 shall prepare a report, in collaboration with the department 2 of education, detailing the expenditures of moneys used for 3 the purposes of this program and its outcomes, which shall be 4 submitted to the general assembly by September 30, 2027. 5 19. BEST BUDDIES IOWA 6 a. For school districts to create opportunities for 7 one-to-one friendships, integrated employment, and leadership 8 development for students with intellectual and developmental 9 disabilities: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 35,000 11 b. The department of education shall establish criteria for 12 the distribution of moneys appropriated under this subsection 13 and shall require an organization receiving moneys under this 14 subsection to annually report student identifying data for 15 students participating in the program to the department in the 16 manner prescribed by the department as a condition of receiving 17 such moneys. 18 20. MIDWESTERN HIGHER EDUCATION COMPACT 19 For distribution to the midwestern higher education compact 20 to pay Iowaâs member state annual obligation: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 118,450 22 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated pursuant 23 to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 24 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 25 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 26 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 27 21. NONPUBLIC SCHOOL CONCURRENT ENROLLMENT PAYMENTS TO 28 COMMUNITY COLLEGES 29 For payments to community colleges for the concurrent 30 enrollment of accredited nonpublic school students under 31 section 261E.8, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 33 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 34 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 35 -7- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 7/ 37 H.F. _____ or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 1 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 2 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 3 22. COMMUNITY COLLEGES 4 For general state financial aid to merged areas, as defined 5 in section 260C.2 , in accordance with section 260C.18C: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $247,008,533 7 23. IOWA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF 8 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 10 equivalent positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,813,313 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 102.85 13 24. IOWA EDUCATIONAL SERVICES FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY 14 IMPAIRED PROGRAM 15 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 16 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 17 equivalent positions: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,112,412 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 68.72 20 25. SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, AND MATHEMATICS 21 (STEM) COLLABORATIVE INITIATIVE 22 For purposes of the science, technology, engineering, and 23 mathematics (STEM) collaborative initiative established in 24 section 256.111, and for not more than the following full-time 25 equivalent positions: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,310,409 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5.00 28 a. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the 29 moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be expended for 30 salaries, staffing, institutional support, activities directly 31 related to recruitment of kindergarten through grade 12 32 mathematics and science teachers, and for ongoing mathematics 33 and science programming for students enrolled in kindergarten 34 through grade 12. 35 -8- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 8/ 37 H.F. _____ b. The department shall work with the community colleges to 1 develop STEM professional development programs for community 2 college instructors and STEM curriculum development. 3 c. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not less 4 than $500,000 shall be used to provide technology education 5 opportunities to high school, career academy, and community 6 college students through a public-private partnership, as 7 well as opportunities for students and faculties at these 8 institutions to secure broad-based information technology 9 certification. The partnership must provide all of the 10 following: 11 (1) A research-based curriculum. 12 (2) Online access to the curriculum. 13 (3) Instructional software for classroom and student use. 14 (4) Certification of skills and competencies in a broad base 15 of information technology-related skill areas. 16 (5) Professional development for teachers. 17 (6) Deployment and program support, including but not 18 limited to integration with current curriculum standards. 19 d. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , of the moneys appropriated 20 in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 21 the close of the fiscal year, an amount equivalent to not more 22 than 5 percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection 23 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 24 summer programs for students until the close of the succeeding 25 fiscal year. 26 26. THERAPEUTIC CLASSROOM INCENTIVE FUND 27 For deposit in the therapeutic classroom incentive fund 28 established in section 256.25 : 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,351,382 30 27. ONLINE STATE JOB POSTING SYSTEM 31 For purposes of administering an online state job posting 32 system that allows the department of education, school 33 districts, charter schools, area education agencies, and 34 accredited nonpublic schools to post job openings on an 35 -9- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 9/ 37 H.F. _____ internet site: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 265,000 2 28. LEAD-K PROGRAM 3 For purposes of developing guidelines for a comprehensive 4 family support mentoring program that meets the language and 5 communication needs of families pursuant to section 256.106: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 7 29. DIVISION OF SPECIAL EDUCATION 8 For general supervision, oversight, compliance, employee 9 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes 10 within the area education agency regions and the department 11 of education main office, and for not more than the following 12 full-time equivalent positions: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 60.00 15 30. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT 16 For purposes of providing required professional development 17 to public and nonpublic schools: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,676,458 19 31. COLLEGE STUDENT AID COMMISSION 20 a. Administration 21 For general administration salaries, support, maintenance, 22 and miscellaneous purposes, and for the administration of the 23 future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship 24 program in accordance with section 256.228, including salaries, 25 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes related to the 26 future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship 27 program, and for not more than the following full-time 28 equivalent positions: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 591,533 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.95 31 b. National guard service scholarship program 32 For purposes of providing national guard service 33 scholarships under the program established in section 256.210: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,600,000 35 -10- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 10/ 37 H.F. _____ c. All Iowa opportunity scholarship program 1 (1) For deposit in the all Iowa opportunity scholarship fund 2 created in section 256.212: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,229,468 4 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, if the 5 moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph exceed $500,000, 6 âeligible institutionâ as defined in section 256.212 shall, 7 during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, include 8 accredited private institutions as defined in section 256.183. 9 d. Teach Iowa scholar program 10 For deposit in the teach Iowa scholar fund established in 11 section 256.218: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,041,361 13 e. Health care professional incentive program 14 For deposit in the health care professional incentive 15 program fund created in section 256.222: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,985,911 17 f. Rural veterinarian loan repayment program 18 For deposit in the rural veterinary care trust fund created 19 in section 256.226: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 21 g. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar 22 scholarship program 23 For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce 24 last-dollar scholarship fund created in section 256.228: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,927,005 26 h. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant program 27 For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant 28 fund created in section 256.229: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 30 i. Iowa workforce grant and incentive program 31 For deposit in the Iowa workforce grant and incentive 32 program fund created in section 256.230: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,500,000 34 j. Court reporter equipment grant program 35 -11- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 11/ 37 H.F. _____ For deposit in the court reporter equipment grant program 1 fund created in section 256.231: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50,000 3 Sec. 3. IOWA SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND 4 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled 5 worker and job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the 6 department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 7 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or 8 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 9 designated: 10 1. For purposes of providing skilled workforce shortage 11 tuition grants in accordance with section 256.227: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 13 2. For deposit in the workforce training and economic 14 development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,100,000 16 From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not 17 more than $100,000 shall be used by the department for 18 administration of the workforce training and economic 19 development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A . 20 3. a. For capital projects at community colleges that meet 21 the definition of the term âvertical infrastructureâ in section 22 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 24 b. Moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 25 disbursed pursuant to section 260G.6, subsection 3 . Projects 26 that qualify for moneys appropriated in this subsection must 27 include at least one of the following: 28 (1) Workforce infrastructure program capital projects. 29 (2) Major renovations and major repair needs, including 30 health, life, and fire safety needs, including compliance with 31 the federal Americans with Disabilities Act. 32 4. For deposit in the pathways for academic career and 33 employment fund created in section 260H.2 : 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,800,000 35 -12- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 12/ 37 H.F. _____ 5. For deposit in the gap tuition assistance fund 1 established in section 260I.2 : 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 3 6. For support costs associated with administering a 4 workforce preparation outcome reporting system for the purpose 5 of collecting and reporting data relating to the educational 6 and employment outcomes of workforce preparation programs 7 receiving moneys pursuant to this section: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 75,000 9 7. For STEM best: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 11 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 12 section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 13 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 14 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 15 succeeding fiscal year. 16 Sec. 4. CHIROPRACTIC LOAN FUNDS. Notwithstanding section 17 256.204, the moneys deposited in the chiropractic loan 18 revolving fund created in section 256.204 for the fiscal year 19 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, may be used 20 for purposes of the chiropractic loan forgiveness program 21 established in section 256.205. 22 Sec. 5. PRESCRIPTION DRUG COSTS. The department of 23 administrative services shall pay the Iowa school for the deaf 24 and the Iowa educational services for the blind and visually 25 impaired program the moneys collected from the counties during 26 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, for expenses relating 27 to prescription drug costs for students attending the Iowa 28 school for the deaf and the Iowa educational services for the 29 blind and visually impaired program. 30 DIVISION III 31 FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS ââ STATE BOARD OF REGENTS 32 Sec. 6. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated 33 from the general fund of the state to the state board of 34 regents for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 35 -13- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 13/ 37 H.F. _____ June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 1 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 2 1. OFFICE OF STATE BOARD OF REGENTS 3 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 4 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 5 equivalent positions: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 764,642 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.48 8 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 9 30, 2027, the state board of regents shall submit a quarterly 10 financial report to the general assembly in a format agreed 11 upon by the state board of regents office and the legislative 12 services agency. The report submitted for the quarter ending 13 December 31, 2026, must include the five-year graduation rates 14 for the regents universities. 15 b. For distribution to the western Iowa regents resource 16 center: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 268,297 18 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 19 June 30, 2027, the state board of regents and the institutions 20 of higher learning governed by the state board of regents 21 shall not reduce moneys budgeted for the fiscal year for the 22 institutionsâ police departments. 23 d. For allocation in equal parts by the state board of 24 regents to the state university of Iowa, the Iowa state 25 university of science and technology, and the university 26 of northern Iowa to support the John Pappajohn centers for 27 entrepreneurship: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 29 The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be 30 used to supplement, not supplant, any other funding received by 31 the John Pappajohn centers for entrepreneurship. 32 2. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 33 a. General university 34 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 35 -14- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 14/ 37 H.F. _____ aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the 1 following full-time equivalent positions: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,496,355 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5,058.32 4 b. Oakdale campus 5 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 6 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 7 equivalent positions: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,103,819 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 38.25 10 c. State hygienic laboratory 11 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 12 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 13 equivalent positions: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,822,610 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 102.51 16 d. Family practice program 17 For allocation by the dean of the college of medicine, with 18 approval of the advisory board, to qualified participants 19 to carry out the provisions of chapter 148D for the family 20 practice residency education program, including salaries 21 and support, and for not more than the following full-time 22 equivalent positions: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,220,598 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.71 25 e. Child health care services 26 For specialized child health care services, including 27 childhood cancer diagnostic and treatment network programs, 28 rural comprehensive care for hemophilia patients, and the 29 Iowa high-risk infant follow-up program, including salaries 30 and support, and for not more than the following full-time 31 equivalent positions: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 634,502 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.16 34 f. Statewide cancer registry 35 -15- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 15/ 37 H.F. _____ For the statewide cancer registry, and for not more than the 1 following full-time equivalent positions: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 143,410 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.10 4 g. Substance abuse consortium 5 For distribution to the Iowa consortium for substance abuse 6 research and evaluation, and for not more than the following 7 full-time equivalent positions: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 53,427 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .99 10 h. Center for biocatalysis 11 For the center for biocatalysis, and for not more than the 12 following full-time equivalent positions: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 696,342 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 6.28 15 i. Primary health care initiative 16 For the primary health care initiative in the college 17 of medicine, and for not more than the following full-time 18 equivalent positions: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 624,374 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 6.22 21 From the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 22 $254,889 shall be allocated to the department of family 23 practice at the state university of Iowa college of medicine 24 for family practice faculty and support staff. 25 j. Birth defects registry 26 For the birth defects registry, and for not more than the 27 following full-time equivalent positions: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 36,839 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .38 30 k. Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center 31 For the Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center, 32 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 33 positions: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 156,389 35 -16- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 16/ 37 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.75 1 l. Iowa online advanced placement academy science, 2 technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative 3 For the Iowa online advanced placement academy science, 4 technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative established 5 in section 263.8A : 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 463,616 7 m. Iowa flood center 8 For the Iowa flood center for use by the universityâs college 9 of engineering pursuant to section 466C.1 : 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,205,593 11 n. College of nursing 12 For employing additional instructors in the college of 13 nursing to increase the number of students who graduate from 14 the college of nursing: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,800,000 16 o. Pediatric cancer research 17 For purposes of pediatric cancer research, including but 18 not limited to laboratory research and clinical trials at the 19 university of Iowa hospitals and clinics: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 21 p. Center for intellectual freedom 22 For purposes of supporting the center for intellectual 23 freedom established in section 263C.2: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 25 3. IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY 26 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 27 aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the 28 following full-time equivalent positions: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $229,864,938 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4,062.34 31 4. UNIVERSITY OF NORTHERN IOWA 32 a. General university 33 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 34 aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the 35 -17- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 17/ 37 H.F. _____ following full-time equivalent positions: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,894,146 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1,250.28 3 b. Real estate education program 4 For purposes of the real estate education program, and for 5 not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 123,523 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .86 8 c. Educators for Iowa 9 For purposes of recruiting additional students to 10 participate in educational opportunities that lead to teacher 11 licensure: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 13 d. Center for civic education 14 For purposes of establishing and operating a center for 15 civic education that promotes the values of free speech, 16 civic leadership, public service, and citizenship, and 17 that enhances civic education among students enrolled in 18 colleges and universities in this state, students enrolled 19 in prekindergarten through grade twelve in schools in this 20 state, teachers, and the public by developing and implementing 21 effective civic learning strategies, encouraging respectful 22 dialogue, and offering educational resources related to free 23 speech and civic knowledge: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 25 Sec. 7. ENERGY COST-SAVINGS PROJECTS ââ FINANCING. For 26 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 27 2027, the state board of regents may use notes, bonds, or 28 other evidences of indebtedness issued under section 262.48 to 29 finance projects that will result in energy cost savings in an 30 amount that will cause the state board to recover the cost of 31 the projects within an average of six years. 32 DIVISION IV 33 STANDING APPROPRIATIONS 34 Sec. 8. AT-RISK CHILDREN. Notwithstanding the standing 35 -18- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 18/ 37 H.F. _____ appropriation in section 279.51 for the fiscal year beginning 1 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the amount appropriated 2 from the general fund of the state to the department of 3 education for programs for at-risk children under section 4 279.51 shall not be more than $10,524,389. The amount of any 5 reduction in this section shall be prorated among the programs 6 specified in section 279.51, subsection 1, paragraphs âaâ, âbâ, 7 and âcâ. 8 Sec. 9. WORK-STUDY APPROPRIATION. Notwithstanding section 9 256.209, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 10 ending June 30, 2027, the amount appropriated from the general 11 fund of the state to the college student aid commission of 12 the department of education for the work-study program under 13 section 256.209 shall be zero. 14 DIVISION V 15 IOWA TUITION GRANTS 16 Sec. 10. Section 256.183, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 3. âEligible institutionâ means an institution of higher 19 learning located in Iowa which is operated privately and 20 not controlled or administered by any state agency or any 21 subdivision of the state, which is not exempt from taxation 22 under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and 23 which meets all of the criteria in subsection 1 , paragraphs 24 âdâ through âkâ , and is a school of barbering and cosmetology 25 arts and sciences licensed under chapter 157 and is accredited 26 by a national accrediting agency recognized by the United 27 States department of education. For the fiscal year beginning 28 July 1, 2017, such a school of barbering and cosmetology arts 29 and sciences shall provide a matching aggregate amount of 30 institutional financial aid equal to at least seventy-five 31 percent of the amount received by the institutionâs students 32 for Iowa tuition grant assistance under section 256.191 . 33 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, the school of 34 barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences shall provide a 35 -19- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 19/ 37 H.F. _____ matching aggregate amount of institutional financial aid equal 1 to at least eighty-five percent of the amount received in 2 that fiscal year. Commencing with the fiscal year beginning 3 July 1, 2019, and each succeeding fiscal year, the school of 4 barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences shall provide a 5 matching aggregate amount of institutional financial aid shall 6 be that is at least equal to the match provided by eligible 7 institutions under section 261.9, subsection 3 , paragraph âaâ , 8 Code 2023. 9 Sec. 11. Section 256.192, subsections 1, 2, 4, and 5, Code 10 2026, are amended to read as follows: 11 1. A vocational-technical tuition grant may be awarded to 12 any resident of Iowa who establishes financial need and who is 13 admitted and in attendance as a full-time or part-time student 14 in a any of the following: 15 a. A vocational-technical or career option program at a 16 community college in the state , and who establishes financial 17 need . 18 b. An eligible institution. 19 2. All classes, including liberal arts classes, identified 20 by the community college or eligible institution as required 21 for completion of the studentâs vocational-technical or 22 career option program , or barbering and cosmetology arts 23 and sciences program, shall be considered a part of the 24 studentâs vocational-technical or career option program 25 or barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences program for 26 the purpose of determining the studentâs eligibility for a 27 grant. Notwithstanding subsection 3 , if a student is making 28 satisfactory academic progress but the student cannot complete 29 a vocational-technical or career option program or barbering 30 and cosmetology arts and sciences program in the time frame 31 allowed for a student to receive a vocational-technical tuition 32 grant as provided in subsection 3 because additional classes 33 are required to complete the program, the student may continue 34 to receive a vocational-technical tuition grant for not more 35 -20- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 20/ 37 H.F. _____ than one additional enrollment period. 1 4. a. (1) The amount of a vocational-technical tuition 2 grant to a qualified full-time student who is enrolled in a 3 vocational-technical or career option program at a community 4 college shall not exceed the lesser of one thousand two hundred 5 dollars per year or the amount of the studentâs established 6 financial need. 7 b. (2) The amount of a vocational-technical tuition 8 grant to a qualified part-time student who is enrolled in a 9 vocational-technical or career option program at a community 10 college in a course of study including at least three semester 11 hours but fewer than twelve semester hours or the trimester 12 or quarter equivalent shall be equal to the amount of a 13 vocational-technical tuition grant that would be paid to a 14 full-time student, except that the commission shall prorate 15 the amount in a manner consistent with the federal Pell grant 16 program proration. 17 b. (1) The amount of a vocational-technical tuition 18 grant to a qualified full-time student who is enrolled in an 19 eligible institution for the fall and spring semesters, or the 20 equivalent, shall be the amount of the studentâs financial need 21 for that period not to exceed six thousand dollars. 22 (2) The amount of a vocational-technical tuition grant to 23 a qualified full-time student who is enrolled in an eligible 24 institution for the summer semester or equivalent shall be 25 one-half the amount of the vocational-technical tuition grant 26 the student receives under subparagraph (1). 27 (3) The amount of a vocational-technical tuition grant to 28 a qualified part-time student who is enrolled in an eligible 29 institution in a course of study including at least three 30 semester hours but fewer than twelve semester hours for the 31 fall, spring, and summer semesters, or the equivalent, shall be 32 equal to the amount of a tuition grant that would be paid to a 33 full-time student times a number which represents the number 34 of hours in which the part-time student is actually enrolled 35 -21- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 21/ 37 H.F. _____ divided by twelve semester hours, or the equivalent. 1 (4) If a qualified student receives financial aid under any 2 other program, the full amount of such financial aid shall be 3 considered part of the studentâs financial resources available 4 in determining the amount of the studentâs financial need 5 for that period. In no case may the stateâs total financial 6 contribution to the studentâs education, including financial 7 aid under any other state or federal program, exceed the 8 tuition and mandatory fees at the eligible institution the 9 student attends. 10 5. A vocational-technical tuition grant shall be awarded 11 on an annual basis, requiring reapplication by the student for 12 each year. Payments under the grant shall be allocated equally 13 among the semesters or quarters of the year upon certification 14 by the institution community college or eligible institution 15 that the student is in full-time or part-time attendance 16 in a vocational-technical or career option program or a 17 barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences program , as defined 18 under rules of the department. If the student discontinues 19 attendance before the end of any term after receiving payment 20 of the grant, the entire amount of any refund due that student, 21 up to the amount of any payments made under the annual grant, 22 shall be paid by the institution community college or eligible 23 institution to the state. 24 Sec. 12. Section 256.194, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 25 amended by striking the subsection. 26 Sec. 13. Section 256.194, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 3. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2025, 29 there is appropriated from the general fund of the state to 30 the commission for deposit in the vocational-technical tuition 31 grants fund established in section 256.192, subsection 8 , the 32 sum of one million seven hundred fifty thousand one hundred 33 eighty-five one million eight hundred sixty-three thousand 34 ninety-nine dollars. 35 -22- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 22/ 37 H.F. _____ Sec. 14. REPEAL. Section 256.191, Code 2026, is repealed. 1 Sec. 15. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. Any moneys appropriated to 2 the college student aid commission for purposes of the Iowa 3 tuition grants for-profit institutions fund established in 4 section 256.191, subsection 8, that remain unencumbered or 5 unobligated as of July 1, 2026, shall be transferred to the 6 vocational-technical tuition grants fund established in section 7 256.192, subsection 8. 8 DIVISION VI 9 STATE PROGRAM ALLOCATION 10 Sec. 16. Section 284.13, subsection 1, paragraph a, 11 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and 13 ending June 30, 2026 2027 , to the department, the amount of 14 five hundred eight thousand two hundred fifty dollars for the 15 issuance of national board certification awards in accordance 16 with section 256.44 . Of the amount allocated under this 17 paragraph, not less than eighty-five thousand dollars shall 18 be used to administer the ambassador to education position in 19 accordance with section 256.45 . 20 Sec. 17. Section 284.13, subsection 1, paragraphs b, c, e, 21 f, and g, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 22 b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and 23 ending June 30, 2026 2027 , up to seven hundred twenty-eight 24 thousand two hundred sixteen dollars to the department for 25 purposes of implementing the professional development program 26 requirements of section 284.6 , assistance in developing model 27 evidence for teacher quality committees established pursuant to 28 section 284.4, subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ , and the evaluator 29 training program in section 284.10 . A portion of the funds 30 allocated to the department for purposes of this paragraph may 31 be used by the department for administrative purposes and for 32 not more than four full-time equivalent positions. 33 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , 34 and ending June 30, 2026 2027 , an amount up to one million 35 -23- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 23/ 37 H.F. _____ seventy-seven thousand eight hundred ten dollars to the 1 department for the establishment of teacher development 2 academies in accordance with section 284.6, subsection 10 . A 3 portion of the funds allocated to the department for purposes 4 of this paragraph may be used for administrative purposes. 5 e. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and 6 ending June 30, 2026 2027 , to the department an amount up to 7 fifty thousand dollars for purposes of the fine arts beginning 8 teacher mentoring program established under section 256.34 . 9 f. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and 10 ending June 30, 2026 2027 , to the department an amount up 11 to six hundred twenty-six thousand one hundred ninety-one 12 dollars shall be used by the department for a delivery system, 13 in collaboration with area education agencies, to assist in 14 implementing the career paths and leadership roles considered 15 pursuant to sections 284.15 , 284.16 , and 284.17 , including but 16 not limited to planning grants to school districts and area 17 education agencies, technical assistance for the department, 18 technical assistance for districts and area education agencies, 19 training and staff development, and the contracting of external 20 expertise and services. In using moneys allocated for purposes 21 of this paragraph, the department shall give priority to school 22 districts with certified enrollments of fewer than six hundred 23 students. A portion of the moneys allocated annually to the 24 department for purposes of this paragraph may be used by the 25 department for administrative purposes and for not more than 26 five full-time equivalent positions. 27 g. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026 2027 , and 28 for each subsequent fiscal year, to the department, ten 29 million dollars for purposes of implementing the supplemental 30 assistance for high-need schools provisions of section 284.11 . 31 Annually, of the moneys allocated to the department for 32 purposes of this paragraph, up to one hundred thousand dollars 33 may be used by the department for administrative purposes and 34 for not more than one full-time equivalent position. 35 -24- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 24/ 37 H.F. _____ DIVISION VII 1 IOWA SPECIAL EDUCATION COUNCIL ââ REPEAL 2 Sec. 18. REPEAL. Section 256.35B, Code 2026, is repealed. 3 DIVISION VIII 4 APPROVAL OF REQUESTS FOR A MODIFIED SUPPLEMENTAL AMOUNT 5 Sec. 19. Section 257.38, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 6 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 Boards of school districts, individually or jointly 8 with boards of other school districts, requesting to use a 9 modified supplemental amount for costs in excess of the amount 10 received under section 257.11, subsection 4 , for programs for 11 at-risk students, secondary students who attend alternative 12 programs and alternative schools, and returning dropouts and 13 dropout prevention, shall annually approve, by resolution, 14 comprehensive program plans for the programs and budget costs, 15 including annual requests for a modified supplemental amount 16 for funding the programs. The program plans shall include: 17 Sec. 20. Section 257.40, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. The school budget review committee 20 and the department of education shall not decrease a school 21 districtâs modified supplemental amount that was approved in a 22 prior budget year due to the failure of the board of directors 23 of a school district to annually approve the school districtâs 24 program plan for dropout prevention. 25 Sec. 21. ASSESSMENTS OF NEGATIVE MODIFIED SUPPLEMENTAL 26 AMOUNT. The school budget review committee and the department 27 of management shall reverse any negative modified supplemental 28 amounts that were assessed against a school district from July 29 1, 2024, through June 30, 2027, due to the failure of the board 30 of directors of the school district to approve the school 31 districtâs program plan for dropout prevention in accordance 32 with section 257.38. 33 DIVISION IX 34 FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT OF WORKFORCE 35 -25- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 25/ 37 H.F. _____ DEVELOPMENT 1 Sec. 22. CAREER TRAINING PHYSICAL EXPANSION PROGRAM. 2 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 3 to the department of workforce development for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 5 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 6 purposes designated: 7 For deposit in the career training physical expansion 8 program fund created in section 84J.3, if enacted by 2026 Iowa 9 Acts, House File 2466, or successor legislation, or by 2026 10 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2168, or successor legislation: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,500,000 12 2. Moneys appropriated in this section are contingent on 13 the career training physical expansion program fund created 14 in section 84J.3, if enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 15 2466, or successor legislation, or by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate 16 File 2168, or successor legislation, receiving no other moneys 17 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, in any Act of the 18 general assembly. 19 DIVISION X 20 BASIC ENROLLMENT ââ CORRECTION 21 Sec. 23. Section 257.6, subsection 2, as amended by 2026 22 Iowa Acts, chapter 1001, section 12, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 2. Basic enrollment. 25 a. Basic enrollment for a budget year is the average of 26 a districtâs actual enrollment for the base year, determined 27 on the date specified under subsection 1, and the districtâs 28 adjusted enrollment for the base year, determined on the date 29 specified under subsection 7. Basic enrollment for the base 30 year is the average of a districtâs actual enrollment for the 31 year preceding the base year, determined on the date specified 32 under subsection 1, and the districtâs adjusted enrollment 33 for the year preceding the base year, determined on the date 34 specified under subsection 7. 35 -26- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 26/ 37 H.F. _____ b. If the department of education discovers any discrepancy 1 or disputes the basic actual enrollment count certified under 2 subsection 2 1 , or the adjusted enrollment count certified 3 under subsection 7, the department shall notify the school 4 district and the school district shall have five business 5 days from the date of notification by the department to 6 voluntarily resolve such dispute or discrepancy. Failure by a 7 school district to timely resolve such dispute or discrepancy 8 shall result in the department of education making a final 9 determination of such enrollment counts for the school 10 district. 11 DIVISION XI 12 HIGHER EDUCATION ââ CIVIC PROFICIENCY 13 Sec. 24. NEW SECTION . 262.100 General education 14 requirements and core curricula ââ courses on American history 15 and American government. 16 1. The state board of regents shall require each institution 17 of higher education governed by the board to establish as 18 a requirement for the completion of any general education 19 requirements or core curricula that an undergraduate student 20 complete an introductory survey course in American history 21 and an introductory survey course in American government. An 22 institution shall assign a value of at least three semester 23 hours of credit to each course. A course required by this 24 section shall be a comprehensive survey of all American history 25 and American government. 26 2. A course required by this section shall fulfill the 27 general education or core curriculum requirement for social 28 sciences or humanities, as designated by the institution, that 29 a student is required to complete as a condition of graduation. 30 3. An institution shall provide equivalent credit toward 31 the courses required by this section to a student transferring 32 to the institution for previous coursework completed by the 33 student that is substantially similar to a required course. 34 4. This section does not apply to a student completing a 35 -27- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 27/ 37 H.F. _____ degree program designated by an institution as a degree program 1 of three years or less in duration. 2 5. a. Annually, the center for cyclone civics at the Iowa 3 state university of science and technology and the center 4 for civic education at the university of northern Iowa shall 5 designate courses at their respective institutions that satisfy 6 the requirements of this section. 7 b. The center for intellectual freedom at the state 8 university of Iowa shall be the sole academic unit at the 9 state university of Iowa responsible for offering courses that 10 satisfy the requirements of this section. 11 Sec. 25. NEW SECTION . 262.105 Lecture and debate series. 12 By December 31, 2026, the center for intellectual freedom at 13 the state university of Iowa, the center for cyclone civics at 14 the Iowa state university of science and technology, and the 15 center for civic education at the university of northern Iowa 16 shall each establish an ongoing lecture and debate series. The 17 series must promote civil dialogue and debate on the issues 18 most important to the American republic. 19 Sec. 26. Section 263C.3, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 20 by striking the subsection. 21 Sec. 27. NEW SECTION . 266.8 Annual report ââ center for 22 cyclone civics. 23 The director of the center for cyclone civics at the Iowa 24 state university of science and technology shall submit an 25 annual report to the governor, the general assembly, and the 26 state board of regents by December 31. The report must provide 27 a full account of the centerâs achievements and must identify 28 any opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development 29 of the center. 30 Sec. 28. NEW SECTION . 268.6 Annual report ââ center for 31 civic education. 32 The director of the center for civic education at the 33 university of northern Iowa shall submit an annual report 34 to the governor, the general assembly, and the state board 35 -28- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 28/ 37 H.F. _____ of regents by December 31. The report must provide a full 1 account of the centerâs achievements and must identify any 2 opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of 3 the center. 4 Sec. 29. REVIEW OF GENERAL EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS AND CORE 5 CURRICULA. By the semester beginning fall 2028, the board of 6 regents shall conduct a review of all undergraduate general 7 education requirements and core curricula at institutions of 8 higher education governed by the board. 9 Sec. 30. APPLICABILITY. The section of this division of 10 this Act enacting section 262.100 applies to undergraduate 11 students beginning enrollment at institutions of higher 12 education governed by the board of regents in academic years 13 beginning on or after July 1, 2028. 14 DIVISION XII 15 HIGHER EDUCATION ââ TUITION 16 Sec. 31. Section 262.9, subsection 19, Code 2026, is amended 17 by adding the following new paragraph: 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. Limit any increase in the amount of 19 tuition charged by an institution of higher education under 20 the boardâs control to a resident undergraduate student to the 21 average of the increases in the higher education price index 22 in the previous three years. This paragraph does not apply 23 to a resident undergraduate student in an academic year if 24 the tuition amount that can be charged to the student in the 25 academic year is limited pursuant to subsection 43. 26 Sec. 32. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 27 following new subsection: 28 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. a. Direct each institution of higher 29 education governed by the board to establish a policy whereby 30 the tuition amount charged to students classified as residents 31 that is charged to an undergraduate student in the studentâs 32 first academic year of enrollment, commencing with a first 33 academic year of enrollment beginning in or after 2027, will 34 not increase in the studentâs subsequent academic years of 35 -29- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 29/ 37 H.F. _____ undergraduate enrollment. 1 b. This subsection only applies to an undergraduate student 2 if, upon enrollment, the student pays a fee to the institution 3 in an amount established by the board not to exceed ten percent 4 of the base resident undergraduate tuition amount for the 5 studentâs first academic year of enrollment. 6 c. For a student who begins the studentâs first academic 7 year of undergraduate enrollment with sufficient academic 8 transfer credits that the student can complete a baccalaureate 9 degree program in less than four academic years, this 10 subsection only applies for the number of academic years 11 necessary for the student to complete a degree program with the 12 studentâs academic transfer credits, rounded up. 13 d. If an undergraduate student transfers to another 14 institution of higher education governed by the board after the 15 studentâs first academic year of enrollment, and the tuition 16 amount that would have been charged to the student during that 17 first academic year by the institution to which the student 18 transfers is greater than the amount charged to the student 19 by the institution from which the student transferred, the 20 institution to which the student transfers may charge the 21 student the greater tuition amount. 22 e. This subsection does not apply to any academic years 23 beyond three consecutive academic years of undergraduate 24 enrollment after a studentâs first academic year of enrollment. 25 DIVISION XIII 26 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ REPORTING REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO 27 ANTIBULLYING PROGRAMMING 28 Sec. 33. Section 279.51A, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 29 amended to read as follows: 30 5. a. Each school district shall report to the department 31 of education, in a manner prescribed by the department, an 32 annual count of all incidents of violence that result in 33 injury or property damage or assault by a student in a school 34 building, on school grounds, or at a school-sponsored function, 35 -30- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 30/ 37 H.F. _____ and any time a student is referred for the use of or transfer 1 to a therapeutic classroom. The report shall include but not 2 be limited to demographic information on students reported as 3 victims and reported as perpetrators of incidents of violence 4 that result in injury or property damage or assault, including 5 but not limited to disaggregated information on race, gender, 6 national origin, age, grade level, and disability, along with 7 any other data required for the department to implement the 8 federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act, as amended by 9 the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95, 10 with appropriate safeguards to ensure student privacy. The 11 department shall compile the reports. 12 b. The department shall compile and summarize the reports, 13 categorized by behavior, and shall submit the summary an annual 14 report to the general assembly by on or before November 1 15 annually each year that contains all of the following: 16 (1) A summary of the annual reports compiled pursuant to 17 paragraph âaâ . 18 (2) A description of the departmentâs antibullying 19 programming and current and projected expenditures for the 20 antibullying programming for the immediately preceding fiscal 21 year. 22 c. A teacher or administrator who submits a report in 23 accordance with this section and who meets the requirements of 24 section 280.27 or section 613.21 shall be immune from civil 25 or criminal liability relating to such action, as well as for 26 participating in any administrative or judicial proceeding 27 resulting from or relating to the report pursuant to the 28 provisions of sections 280.27 and 613.21 . The provisions of 29 section 70A.29 shall apply to a teacher or administrator who 30 submits a report in accordance with this section or who reports 31 an incident of violence or assault to a local law enforcement 32 agency in good faith and without fraudulent intent or the 33 intent to deceive. Personal information regarding a student 34 in a report submitted pursuant to this section shall be kept 35 -31- LSB 5003YC (8) 91 jda/jh 31/ 37 H.F. _____ confidential as required under the federal Family Educational 1 Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1232g, and in the same 2 manner as personal information in student records maintained, 3 created, collected, or assembled by or for a school corporation 4 or educational institution in accordance with section 22.7, 5 subsection 1 . 6